New York, session 2025-2026, S8229.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a 2 qualified New York city musical and theatrical production company called 3 "A Beautiful Noise, LLC", located at 1501 Broadway Suite, 1304 New York, 4 New York, for taxable year 2022, that otherwise would have been eligible 5 for the New York city musical and theatrical production tax credit but 6 for not filing of an application by a prescribed due date set forth by 7 the commissioner of economic development, shall be eligible to file an 8 application for the New York city musical and theatrical production tax 9 credit for a production in 2022. 10 § 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-c of the tax law or 11 any other provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a claim 12 for the New York city musical and theatrical production tax credit may 13 be filed by the qualified New York city musical and theatrical 14 production company located at 1501 Broadway Suite, 1304 New York, New 15 York, for tax year 2022. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 17 years beginning on or after January 1, 2022 and before January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13013-01-5